Nebraska, session 109, LB641.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 68-919, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
68-919 (1) The recipient of medical assistance under the medical
assistance program shall be indebted to the department for the total amount
paid for medical assistance on behalf of the recipient if:
(a) The recipient was fifty-five years of age or older at the time the
medical assistance was provided; or
(b) The recipient resided in a medical institution and, at the time of
institutionalization or application for medical assistance, whichever is later,
the department determines that the recipient could not have reasonably been
expected to be discharged and resume living at home. For purposes of this
section, medical institution means a nursing facility, an intermediate care
facility for persons with developmental disabilities, an assisted living
facility, or an inpatient hospital.
(2)(a) (2) The debt accruing under subsection (1) of this section arises
during the life of the recipient but shall be held in abeyance until the death
of the recipient. Any such debt to the department that exists when the
recipient dies shall be recovered only after the death of the recipient's
spouse, if any, and only after the recipient is not survived by a child who
either is under twenty-one years of age or is blind or totally and permanently
disabled as defined by the Supplemental Security Income criteria. In recovering
such debt, the department shall not foreclose on a lien on the home of the
recipient (i) (a) if a sibling of the recipient with an equity interest in the
home has lawfully resided in the home for at least one year before the
recipient's admission and has lived there continuously since the date of the
recipient's admission or (ii) (b) while the home is the residence of an adult
child who has lived in the recipient's home for at least two years immediately
before the recipient was institutionalized, has lived there continuously since
that time, and can establish to the satisfaction of the department that he or
she provided care that delayed the recipient's admission. Such care may be
reimbursed or unreimbursed.
(b) A written attestation by a physician stating that a sibling or an
adult child of a recipient provided care that delayed the recipient's admission
to a medical institution shall be sufficient documentation for the department
to avoid foreclosure on the lien described in this subsection.
(3) The debt shall include the total amount of medical assistance provided
when the recipient was fifty-five years of age or older or during a period of
institutionalization as described in subsection (1) of this section and shall
not include interest.
(4)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the debt specified in
subsection (1) of this section be collected by the department before any
portion of the estate of a recipient of medical assistance is enjoyed by or
transferred to a person not specified in subsection (2) of this section as a
result of the death of such recipient. The debt may be recovered from the
estate of a recipient of medical assistance. The department shall undertake all
reasonable and cost-effective measures to enforce recovery under the Medical
Assistance Act. All persons specified in subsections (2) and (4) of this
section shall cooperate with the department in the enforcement of recovery
under the act.
(b) For purposes of this section:
(i) Estate of a recipient of medical assistance means any real estate,
personal property, or other asset in which the recipient had any legal title or
interest at or immediately preceding the time of the recipient's death, to the
extent of such interests. In furtherance and not in limitation of the
foregoing, the estate of a recipient of medical assistance also includes:
(A) Assets to be transferred to a beneficiary described in section 77-2004
or 77-2005 in relation to the recipient through a revocable trust or other
similar arrangement which has become irrevocable by reason of the recipient's
death; and
(B) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in subdivision (3) or (4) of
section 68-923, assets conveyed or otherwise transferred to a survivor, an
heir, an assignee, a beneficiary, or a devisee of the recipient of medical
assistance through joint tenancy, tenancy in common, transfer on death deed,
survivorship, conveyance of a remainder interest, retention of a life estate or
of an estate for a period of time, living trust, or other arrangement by which
value or possession is transferred to or realized by the beneficiary of the
conveyance or transfer at or as a result of the recipient's death. Such other
-1-

LB641 LB641
2025 2025
arrangements include insurance policies or annuities in which the recipient of
medical assistance had at the time of death any incidents of ownership of the
policy or annuity or the power to designate beneficiaries and any pension
rights or completed retirement plans or accounts of the recipient. A completed
retirement plan or account is one which because of the death of the recipient
of medical assistance ceases to have elements of retirement relating to such
recipient and under which one or more beneficiaries exist after such
recipient's death; and
(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in subdivision (4)(b) of
this section, estate of a recipient of medical assistance does not include:
(A) Insurance proceeds, any trust account subject to the Burial Pre-Need
Sale Act, or any limited lines funeral insurance policy to the extent used to
pay for funeral, burial, or cremation expenses of the recipient of medical
assistance;
(B) Conveyances of real estate made prior to August 24, 2017, that are
subject to the grantor's retention of a life estate or an estate for a period
of time;
(C) Life estate interests in real estate after sixty months from the date
of recording a deed with retention of a life estate by the recipient of medical
assistance; and
(D) Any pension rights or completed retirement plans to the extent that
such rights or plans are exempt from claims for reimbursement of medical
assistance under federal law; and .
(E) Life estate interests in real estate after twelve months from the
recording of a deed with retention of a life estate by the recipient of medical
assistance if a relative resides solely and continuously with the recipient and
establishes to the satisfaction of the department that the relative provided
care that delayed the recipient's admission to a medical institution. A written
attestation by a physician stating that the relative of the recipient provided
care that delayed the recipient's admission to a medical institution shall be
sufficient documentation to exclude the life estate interest from the
recipient's estate under this subdivision.
(c) The department, upon application of the personal representative of an
estate, any person or entity otherwise authorized under the Nebraska Probate
Code to act on behalf of a decedent, any person or entity having an interest in
assets of the decedent which are subject to this subsection, a successor
trustee of a revocable trust or other similar arrangement which has become
irrevocable by reason of the decedent's death, or any other person or entity
holding assets of the decedent described in this subsection, shall timely
certify to the applicant, that as of a designated date, whether medical
assistance reimbursement is due or an application for medical assistance was
pending that may result in medical assistance reimbursement due. An application
for a certificate under this subdivision shall be provided to the department in
a delivery manner and at an address designated by the department, which manner
may include email. The department shall post the acceptable manner of delivery
on its website. Any application that fails to conform with such manner is void.
Notwithstanding the lack of an order by a court designating the applicant as a
person or entity who may receive information protected by applicable privacy
laws, the applicant shall have the authority of a personal representative for
the limited purpose of seeking and obtaining from the department this
certification. If, in response to a certification request, the department
certifies that reimbursement for medical assistance is due, the department may
release some or all of the property of a decedent from the provisions of this
subsection.
(d) An action for recovery of the debt created under subsection (1) of
this section may be brought by the department against the estate of a recipient
of medical assistance as defined in subdivision (4)(b) of this section at any
time before five years after the last of the following events:
(i) The death of the recipient of medical assistance;
(ii) The death of the recipient's spouse, if applicable;
(iii) The attainment of the age of twenty-one years by the youngest of the
recipient's minor children, if applicable; or
(iv) A determination that any adult child of the recipient is no longer
blind or totally and permanently disabled as defined by the Supplemental
Security Income criteria, if applicable.
(5) In any probate proceedings in which the department has filed a claim
under this section, no additional evidence of foundation shall be required for
the admission of the department's payment record supporting its claim if the
payment record bears the seal of the department, is certified as a true copy,
and bears the signature of an authorized representative of the department.
(6) The department may waive or compromise its claim, in whole or in part,
if the department determines that enforcement of the claim would not be in the
best interests of the state or would result in undue hardship as provided in
rules and regulations of the department.
(7)(a) Whenever the department has provided medical assistance because of
sickness or injury to any person resulting from a third party's wrongful act or
negligence and the person has recovered damages from such third party, the
department shall have the right to recover the medical assistance it paid from
any amounts that the person has received as follows:
(i) In those cases in which the person is fully compensated by the
recovery, the department shall be fully reimbursed subject to its contribution
to attorney's fees and costs as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection;
or
-2-

LB641 LB641
2025 2025
(ii) In those cases in which the person is not fully compensated by the
recovery, the department shall be reimbursed that portion of the recovery that
represents the same proportionate reduction of medical expenses paid that the
recovery amount bears to full compensation of the person subject to its
contributions to attorney's fees and costs as provided in subdivision (b) of
this subsection.
(b) When an action or claim is brought by the person and the person incurs
or will incur a personal liability to pay attorney's fees and costs of
litigation or costs incurred in pursuit of a claim, the department's claim for
reimbursement of the medical assistance provided to the person shall be reduced
by an amount that represents the department's reasonable pro rata share of
attorney's fees and costs of litigation or the costs incurred in pursuit of a
claim.
(8) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out this section.
(9) The changes made to this section by Laws 2019, LB593, shall apply
retroactively to August 30, 2015.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-919, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
-3-